Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2427
Power projects; creation of agency; petition; contents.

Upon adoption of ordinances or resolutions in accordance with section 18-2420, a petition shall be addressed to the Nebraska Power Review Board stating that it is the intent and purpose to create an agency pursuant to sections 18-2426 to 18-2434, subject to approval by the Nebraska Power Review Board. The petition shall state the name of the proposed agency, the names of the proposed participating municipalities, the name and residence of each of the directors so far as known, a certified copy of each of the ordinances or resolutions of the participating municipalities determining the need for such an agency, a certified copy of the proceedings of each municipality evidencing the director's right to office, a general description of the operation in which the agency intends to engage, and the location and method of operation of the proposed plants and systems of the agency.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 27;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 57;

Laws 2003, LB 165, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB199, § 5.